Utah statutes.
32B-4-504.   Making false statements.

(1) (a)  A person who makes a false material statement under oath or affirmation in an official proceeding before the commission or the department is guilty of a second degree felony.

(b)  As used in Subsection (1)(a), "material" statement is as defined in Section 76-8-501.

(2)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if that person knowingly:

(a)  makes a false statement under oath or affirmation in an official proceeding before the commission or the department;

(b)  makes a false statement with a purpose to mislead a public servant in performing that public servant's official functions under this title;

(c)  makes a false statement and the statement is required by this title to be sworn or affirmed before a notary or other person authorized to administer oaths;

(d)  makes a false written statement on or pursuant to a record required by this title;

(e)  creates a false impression in a record required by this title by omitting information necessary to prevent a statement in them from being misleading;

(f)  makes a false written statement with intent to deceive a public servant in the performance of that public servant's official functions under this title; or

(g)  submits or invites reliance on a record required under this title which that person knows to lack authenticity.

(3)  A person is not guilty under Subsection (2) if that person retracts the falsification before it becomes apparent that the falsification is or will be exposed.

